Idaho, session 2025, H0301.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-3501B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-3501B. DEFINITIONS. The terms defined in this section shall apply
to this chapter and shall have the following meanings, unless the context
clearly indicates another meaning:
(1) "Account category" means a grouping of transactions for the pur-
poses of identifying expenditure classifications, including personnel
costs, operating expenditures, capital outlay, and trustee and benefit pay-
ments.
(2) "Appropriation" means a provision of legal authority given by the
legislature that permits a department, office, or institution of the state
to draw moneys from the state treasury for an object or demand against the
state that is specified by amount, program, account category, fund, and pe-
riod.
(3) "Encumbrance" means the recognition of a commitment that is a re-
duction against a current year appropriation and will subsequently become an
expenditure when a good or service is received.


(4) "Executive carry forward" means an increase in the current year ap-
propriation resulting from an unliquidated encumbrance balance from a prior
fiscal year.
(5) "Fund" means a category of moneys in the treasury from which appro-
priations are made and the use of which is prescribed by law.
(6) "Program" means an activity or function of a department, office, or
institution of the state, or a grouping thereof, for which appropriations
are made and expenditures are reported.
(7) "Property" has the same meaning as that term is defined in section
67-9203, Idaho Code.
(8) "Request for information" has the same meaning as that term is de-
fined in section 67-9203, Idaho Code.
(9) "Request for proposal" has the same meaning as that term is defined
in section 67-9203, Idaho Code.
(10) "Request for quote" has the same meaning as that term is defined in
section 67-9203, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-3502, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-3502. FORMAT AND PREPARATION OF ANNUAL BUDGET REQUESTS -- EX-
CEPTIONS FOR EMERGENCIES. (1) In the preparation of a state budget, the
administrator of the division of financial management shall, not later
than the fifteenth day of July, have available for all departments, offices
and institutions of the state government forms necessary to prepare budget
requests. Such forms, whether in electronic or written format, shall be
developed by the administrator of the division and the legislative services
office to provide the following information:
(a) For the preceding fiscal year, each of the entities listed in this
section shall report all moneys available to them regardless of source,
including legislative appropriations, and their expenditures by fund
and account category of all sums received from all sources, segregated
as provided for on the forms;
(b) For the current fiscal year, each of the entities listed in this
section shall report their estimates of all moneys available to them
regardless of source, including legislative appropriations, and their
estimated expenditures by fund and account category of all sums re-
ceived from all sources, segregated as provided for on the forms,
including a statement of the purposes for which anticipated moneys are
expected to be expended, and an estimated cost for each request to ac-
quire property, including requests to replace existing property, that
is estimated to cost two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or
more based on data collected through a request for quote or a request for
information;
(c) An estimate of appropriations needed for the succeeding fiscal
year, showing each primary program or major objective as a separate item
of the request and itemized by account category;
(d) A report concerning the condition and management of programs,
program performance, and progress toward accomplishing program objec-
tives; and


(e) A report that discloses any known future reductions or eliminations
of federal moneys reported to the division of financial management un-
der section 67-1910, Idaho Code, and the agency's plan for operating if
there is a reduction of ten percent (10%) or more in the federal moneys
that the state agency receives; and
(f) A complete draft request for proposal for the request to acquire
property, including requests to replace existing property, that is es-
timated to cost two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more
and that requires a competitive bid under the provisions of chapter 92,
title 67, Idaho Code.
(2) The completed forms shall, not later than the first day of Septem-
ber, except with special permission and agreement of the administrator of
the division of financial management and the director of the legislative
services office, be filed in the office of the administrator of the division
of financial management and the legislative services office. The department
of administration's division of public works shall, as early as practicable
and in any event no later than the fifteenth day of November 15, prepare and
file in the office of the governor and the legislative services office upon
on the forms described in this section a report of all of the information
required in this section. The judicial department shall include in its fil-
ing the budget request of the judicial council as submitted by the judicial
council.
(3) The governor may declare that a request to acquire replacement
property that is estimated to cost two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) or more and that requires a competitive bid under the provisions
of chapter 92, title 67, Idaho Code, qualifies as an emergency if:
(a) The requested property is identified by the department, office, or
institution after the deadline provided in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion;
(b) The department, office, or institution provides an estimated cost
for the replacement property based on data collected through a request
for information provided under subsection (1)(b) of this section prior
to the start of the legislative session in January; and
(c) The failure to acquire the property will interfere with the statu-
tory responsibilities of the department, office, or institution.
(4) The governor may declare that a request to acquire new property that
is estimated to cost between two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
and one million dollars ($1,000,000) and that requires a competitive bid
pursuant to chapter 92, title 67, Idaho Code, qualifies as an emergency if:
(a) The requested property is identified by the department, office, or
institution after the deadline provided in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion;
(b) The department, office or institution can provide an estimated cost
for the property based on data collected through a request for informa-
tion provided under subsection (1)(b) of this section prior to the start
of the legislative session in January; and
(c) The failure to acquire the property will interfere with the statu-
tory responsibilities of the department, office, or institution.
(5) Requests to acquire property submitted under the provisions of sub-
sections (3) and (4) of this section shall be exempt from the requirement to


provide a draft request for proposal as provided in subsection (1) of this
section.
(6) Draft requests for proposals for emergency requests filed pursuant
to subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall be completed no later than
March 31. The legislature may decline to appropriate moneys for the acquisi-
tion of such property or remove funding for the same from appropriation bills
if a completed draft request for proposal has not been filed for such prop-
erty by the deadline.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-9202, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9202. DECLARATION OF POLICY. The Idaho legislature, recognizing
that an offered low price is not always indicative of the greatest value,
declares it to be the policy of the state:
(1) To engage in open, competitive acquisitions of property; and
(2) To provide a consistent process on a predictable timeline to ensure
that the lowest responsible bid is secured; and
(2) (3) To maximize the value received by the state with attendant bene-
fits to the citizens.
SECTION 4. That Section 67-9203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9203. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Acquisition" means the process of procuring property.
(2) "Administrator" means the administrator of the division of pur-
chasing as created by section 67-9204, Idaho Code.
(3) "Agency" means all officers, departments, divisions, bureaus,
boards, commissions and institutions of the state, including the public
utilities commission, but excluding:
(a) The legislative and judicial branches of government;
(b) The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state con-
troller, state treasurer, attorney general and superintendent of pub-
lic instruction; and
(c) Except as provided in section 67-9234, Idaho Code, a state insti-
tution of higher education that complies with the provisions of section
67-9225, Idaho Code.
(4) "Bid" means a written offer to perform a contract to sell or other-
wise supply property in response to a solicitation.
(5) "Bidder" means a vendor who has submitted a bid on property to be
acquired by the state.
(6) "Contract" means an agreement for the acquisition of property, in-
cluding a purchase order.
(7) "Contractor" means a vendor who has been awarded a contract.
(8) "Director" means the director of the department of administration
as created by section 67-5701, Idaho Code.
(9) "Environmental, social, and governance standards" means procure-
ment standards that screen or score bids, in whole or in part, on subjective
ethical or sustainability criteria unrelated to the specifications in a so-
licitation or the qualifications of a bidder.


(10) "Lowest responsible bidder" means the responsible bidder whose bid
reflects the lowest acquisition price to be paid by the state and who meets
the bid qualifications, except that when specifications are valued or com-
parative performance evaluations are conducted, the results of such exami-
nations and the relative score of valued specifications will be weighed, as
set out in the specifications, in determining the lowest acquisition price.
(11) "Multiple award" means a contract awarded to two (2) or more bid-
ders to furnish the same or similar property when necessary or convenient to
ensure adequate delivery, service, or product compatibility.
(11) (12) "Open contract" means a contract awarded by the state through
the division of purchasing as a result of a competitive solicitation to one
(1) or more vendors who have agreed to allow all agencies to procure speci-
fied property under the terms and conditions set forth in the contract.
(12) (13) "Procure" means to obtain property for state use in a manner
other than by gift, including, but not limited to, purchase, lease or rent.
(13) (14) "Property" means goods, services, parts, supplies and equip-
ment, both tangible and intangible, including, but not limited to, designs,
plans, programs, systems, techniques and any rights or interests in such
property.
(15) "Request for information" means a formal request to potential ven-
dors to provide information on their capabilities, services, and pricing, in
order to create a draft request for proposals.
(16) "Request for proposal" means a formal request for vendors to sub-
mit a bid, which includes the total scope of services and is the basis of the
award of a contract.
(17) "Request for quote" means a formal request to vendors for pricing
and terms on specific property.
(14) (18) "Sole source" means the only vendor from whom specific prop-
erty is available to procure.
(15) (19) "Solicitation" means an invitation to bid, a request for pro-
posal, a request for information, or a request for quote issued pursuant to
this chapter for the purpose of procuring identifying the scope of requested
work, which may include the eventual procurement of property.
(16) (20) "Specifications" means the standards or requirements for
property to be procured as explicitly stated in a solicitation or contract.
(17) (21) "State institution of higher education" means Boise state
university, Idaho state university or Lewis-Clark state college.
(18) (22) "Vendor" means a person or entity capable of supplying prop-
erty to the state.
SECTION 5. That Section 67-9205, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9205. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE ADMINISTRATOR. The administrator of
the division of purchasing:
(1) Shall acquire all property for state agencies according to the pro-
visions of this chapter;
(2) Shall acquire all property by competitive solicitation, except as
otherwise provided;


(3) Shall determine, based on the specifications and matters relating
to responsibility, the lowest responsible bidder or bidders in all competi-
tive solicitations;
(4) Shall enter into contracts and any modifications thereto for the
acquisition of property on behalf of and in the name of state agencies;
(5) Shall, when economically feasible and practical, consolidate so-
licitations and acquire property in amounts as large as can be efficiently
managed and controlled;
(6) May, in the evaluation of paper product bids, give those items that
meet the recycled content standards as specified by the administrator a five
percent (5%) purchasing preference. As such, those qualifying paper prod-
ucts may be considered to cost five percent (5%) less when choosing the low-
est responsible bidder;
(7) May appoint a deputy who shall have the power to act for the adminis-
trator and in the administrator's place while absent, which deputy shall be
bonded to the state of Idaho as prescribed by chapter 8, title 59, Idaho Code;
(8) May require from any contractor the submission of a performance
bond for such sum as will, in the opinion of the administrator, guarantee
the faithful performance of such contract, and the amount and requirement
therefor shall be set out in the specifications;
(9) May enter into open contracts based on actual or estimated require-
ments;
(10) May enter into contracts, including leases and rentals, for peri-
ods of time exceeding one (1) year, provided that such contracts contain no
penalty to or restriction upon on the state in the event cancellation is ne-
cessitated by a lack of funding for any such contract;
(11) Is authorized and empowered to formulate rules, subject to the ap-
proval of the director, to effect the provisions of this chapter;
(12) May enter into negotiations for acquisitions in accordance with
established rules of the division;
(13) May inspect property supplied by a contractor to determine whether
it meets specifications;
(14) May classify, after review with the various agencies, the require-
ments of the state for all property that may be acquired, and may adopt stan-
dards of quality for property, and may establish specifications for acquisi-
tion. Each specification shall, until revised or rescinded, apply alike in
terms and effect to each future acquisition of the classified property;
(15) May delegate authority pursuant to section 67-9206, Idaho Code;
and
(16) May carry out such acts as are necessary to enforce the provisions
of this chapter; and
(17) May issue a multiple award contract to two (2) or more bidders.
SECTION 6. That Section 67-9208, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9208. SOLICITATIONS. (1) The administrator shall not make or cause
to be made any acquisition until a requisition for the property to be ac-
quired has been submitted to the administrator's office by the requisition-
ing agency. The requisition shall certify to the administrator's satisfac-
tion that the governor approved the relevant appropriation bill pursuant to


section 67-3502, Idaho Code, or that there are sufficient funds or balance
in appropriations out of which the amount of the requisition may be lawfully
paid, except as provided in section 67-9221(3), Idaho Code.
(2) Upon determining that an agency's requisition complies with the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the administrator shall is-
sue a solicitation for the acquisition of property as provided in section
67-3502(1), Idaho Code, in the same calendar year of the approved appro-
priation bill. The administrator may post the solicitation up to three (3)
months before July 1 but no later than July 1 in the current calendar year.
Solicitations for emergency requests for the acquisition of property as
provided in section 67-3502, Idaho Code, shall be published no later than
September 1. For solicitations related to the renewal of an existing con-
tract of up to thirty-five (35) months in length, the administrator shall
post the solicitation no later than six (6) months prior to the end of the
contract. For solicitations related to the renewal of an existing contract
of three (3) years or more in length, the administrator shall post the solic-
itation no later than eighteen (18) months prior to the contract expiration.
Notice of the solicitation shall be posted in a conspicuous manner as pre-
scribed by rule. The notice shall describe the property to be acquired in
sufficient detail to apprise a vendor of the exact nature of the property
being sought and shall set forth the bid closing date, time and location.
(3) The administrator may establish by rule exceptions to the notice
provisions in subsection (2) of this section; provided however, that the
procurements excepted from the notice provisions must be minor in nature.
(4) After the administrator publishes the solicitation, the following
schedule shall apply:
(a) Bidders shall have up to sixty (60) days to respond to the solic-
itation. A shorter timeline of thirty (30) or forty-five (45) days to
respond may be set by the administrator if included in the notice of the
solicitation;
(b) The administrator shall have up to sixty (60) days to review the
bids submitted pursuant section 67-9209, Idaho Code. The administrator
may request an extension of no more than thirty (30) days with the ap-
proval of the director and notice of the reason for the request provided
to all vendors with active bids under consideration; and
(c) The administrator shall notify the vendor that will be awarded a
contract no later than five (5) business days after completing a review
of the bids pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(5) For any solicitations that require the approval of a third party,
including but not limited to the centers for medicare and medicaid services,
the administrator and participating vendors shall follow the schedule pur-
suant to subsection (4) of this section with the expectation that the overall
solicitation and bid schedule will shift to include any additional time re-
quired by the third party.
(6) At the time a notice of solicitation is issued, the administrator
shall also publish the process for bid analysis or scoring. Such process
shall not change after the solicitation is issued.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 92, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-9208A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


67-9208A. INTENT TO SOLICIT. (1) If an appropriation bill is approved
by the governor that includes a request to acquire property from an agency
pursuant to section 67-3502, Idaho Code, the administrator shall post notice
of the agency's intent to solicit for the identified property within ten (10)
days of the governor's approval on the state's procurement website.
(2) If any agency intends to seek the renewal of a contract, the admin-
istrator shall post notice of the agency's intent to solicit on the state's
procurement website no later than one (1) month prior to the deadline pro-
vided in section 67-9208(2), Idaho Code, for solicitations related to the
renewal of an existing contract.
(3) An intent to solicit shall include the date the solicitation will be
available to bidders and a schedule for the solicitation and bidding process
as provided in section 67-9208, Idaho Code.
(4) For future solicitations intended to replace existing property and
that do not require a new appropriation, the administrator shall post notice
of the agency's intent to solicit no later than thirty (30) days prior to pub-
lishing the solicitation.
(5) In the case of requests to acquire property that the governor des-
ignates as emergencies pursuant to section 67-3502, Idaho Code, the adminis-
trator shall post notice of the agency's intent to solicit no later than Au-
gust 2 and a schedule for the solicitation and bid process as provided in sec-
tion 67-9208, Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. That Section 67-9209, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9209. BIDS. (1) In response to a solicitation or an intent to so-
licit issued pursuant to section 67-9208 or 67-9208A, Idaho Code, a vendor
seeking to supply the property solicited shall submit a bid in a manner pre-
scribed by rule.
(2) Vendors who did not participate or submit a request for information
under the provisions of section 67-3502, Idaho Code, may still submit a bid
in response to a solicitation.
(2) (3) To enhance small business bidding opportunities, the adminis-
trator shall seek a minimum of three (3) bids from vendors having a signifi-
cant Idaho economic presence as defined in section 67-2349, Idaho Code.
(3) (4) All bids received shall be opened at the time and place spec-
ified in the solicitation. The bids shall be opened in public view, and a
record of each bid shall then and there be made. The administrator shall have
the right to reject any and all bids pursuant to rules established for the di-
vision.
SECTION 9. That Section 67-9210, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9210. AWARD OF CONTRACT. (1) The administrator shall award con-
tracts to, and place orders for property with, the lowest responsible
bidder. Qualifications for responsibility shall be prescribed by rule.
However, environmental, social, and governance standards may not be used as
a qualification for responsibility. Prior performance on state contracts
may be used to determine qualifications.


(2) Where both the bids and quality of property offered are the same,
preference shall be given to property of local and domestic production and
manufacture or from bidders having a significant Idaho economic presence as
defined in section 67-2349, Idaho Code. In connection with the award of any
contract for the placement of any order for state printing, binding, engrav-
ing or stationery work, the provisions of sections 60-101 and 60-103, Idaho
Code, shall apply to the extent that the same may be inconsistent with any re-
quirements contained in this section.
(3) In awarding contracts, the administrator shall not discriminate
against, or grant preferential treatment to, any individual or group on the
basis of race, sex, color, ethnicity, or national origin unless permitted by
an exception described in section 67-5909A, Idaho Code.
(4) All contracts for the acquisition of new property originating from
solicitations issued in a calendar year shall be awarded by December 31, ex-
cept for solicitations related to emergency requests to acquire property,
which shall be awarded no later than February 1 in the following calendar
year. For contracts dependent on third-party approval, including but not
limited to the centers for medicare and medicaid services, contract awards
shall occur as soon as feasible following the completion of any third-party
requirements.
(5) The administrator may award a contract to two (2) or more qualified
bidders to furnish the same or similar property when necessary or convenient
to ensure adequate delivery, service, or product compatibility.
SECTION 10. That Section 67-9211, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 11. That Chapter 92, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-9211, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-9211. MULTIPLE AWARDS. (1) When a contract for property has been
awarded to two (2) or more bidders in accordance with the provisions of sec-
tion 67-9210, Idaho Code, a state agency shall select which bidder to pur-
chase the property from based on factors including but not limited to compat-
ibility, price, availability, support services, delivery, and past perfor-
mance.
(2) State agencies that make recurring purchases pursuant to a contract
awarded under this section shall perform the analysis outlined in subsection
(1) of this section at least annually.
SECTION 12. That Section 67-9215, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9215. PRESERVATION AND DISCLOSURE OF RECORDS -- EXCEPTION. (1) The
administrator shall preserve all records relating to solicitations in the
administrator's office, and information with respect thereto, in such form
as the administrator shall prescribe by rule, for a period of three (3) years
after the date of final action, or for a period of time as may be prescribed
by a record retention guideline schedule approved by the director. Records


preserved under the provisions of this section shall be subject to disclo-
sure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.
(2) If a solicitation is canceled prior to award of a contract, the
administrator shall immediately return all bids to the submitting vendors
or delete bids that were received electronically. Bids returned or deleted
pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to disclosure under chapter
1, title 74, Idaho Code.
(3) Vendor information provided in a request for information or request
for quote under the provisions of section 67-3502, Idaho Code, shall not be
subject to disclosure unless the vendors respond to the relevant solicita-
tion as provided for in section 67-9208, Idaho Code.
SECTION 13. That Section 67-9230, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9230. PROHIBITIONS. (1) No contract or any interest therein shall
be transferred by the contractor to whom such contract is given to any other
party without approval in writing by the administrator and by the board of
examiners pursuant to section 67-1027, Idaho Code. Transfer of a contract
without approval shall cause the annulment of the contract so transferred,
at the option of the state. All rights of action, however, for any breach of
such contract by the contracting parties are reserved to the state.
(2) No member of the legislature or any officer or employee of any
branch of the state government shall directly, himself, or by any other per-
son in trust for him or for his use or benefit or on his account, undertake,
execute, hold or enjoy, in whole or in part, any contract made or entered into
by or on behalf of the state of Idaho, if made by, through, or on behalf of the
department in which he is an officer or employee; or if made by, through or
on behalf of any other department unless the same is made after competitive
bids.
(3) Except as provided in this chapter, no officer or employee shall in-
fluence or attempt to influence the award of a contract to a particular ven-
dor, or to deprive or attempt to deprive any vendor of a contract.
(4) No officer or employee shall conspire with a vendor or its agent,
and no vendor or its agent shall conspire with an officer or employee, to in-
fluence or attempt to influence the award of a contract, or to deprive or at-
tempt to deprive a vendor of a contract.
(5) No officer or employee shall fail to use an open contract except as
provided in this chapter.
(6) No officer or employee shall accept property knowing that the prop-
erty does not meet specifications or other acceptance criteria set forth in
the contract.
(7) Deprivation, influence or attempts thereat shall not include writ-
ten reports, based upon on substantial evidence, sent to the administrator
concerning matters relating to the responsibility of vendors.
(8)(a) No vendor or related party, or subsidiary, or affiliate of a ven-
dor, may submit a bid to obtain a contract to provide property to the
state, if the vendor or related party, or affiliate, or subsidiary was
paid for services used in preparing the specifications or if the ser-
vices influenced the procurement process to prepare the specifications
for the property.


(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a vendor from submitting a
bid after providing technical assistance relating to such bid, includ-
ing under the provisions of section 67-3502, Idaho Code, providing con-
sulting or other services to a state agency, or participating in leg-
islative committee meetings related to the property that is the subject
of planned solicitation as long as:
(i) Such technical assistance, consulting or other services, or
participation in legislative committee meetings does not result
in bid specifications to be drawn such that only the vendor or re-
lated party, or affiliate or subsidiary of the vendor, can meet the
bid specifications;
(ii) Such technical assistance, consulting or other services,
or participation in legislative committee meetings does not oth-
erwise provide the vendor or related party, or affiliate or sub-
sidiary of the vendor, with a quantifiable and objective advantage
in the bid process; and
(iii) Any work product or written documentation produced as a re-
sult of the technical assistance, consulting or other services, or
participation in legislative committee meeting is accessible to
any requestor pursuant to a public records request.
(9) No person who has served in a public office within three hundred
sixty-five (365) days of a bid submission deadline may participate in the
solicitation, bid, or contract process pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter on behalf of a vendor.
(10) No vendor may employ an individual who has served in public office,
or worked in a state agency or institution, within three hundred sixty-five
(365) days of winning a bid where such individual participated in the solici-
tation, bid, or contract process pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 14. That Section 67-9233, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-9233. ETHICS IN PROCUREMENT. (1) It is the intent of the legisla-
ture that all persons involved in the process of procuring property for the
state conduct themselves in a manner that protects the public interest and
fosters confidence in the integrity of the process. To that end, this sec-
tion shall apply to all such persons, including:
(a) State officers, even if the officer or officer's employer is ex-
cluded from the definition of "agency" under section 67-9203, Idaho
Code;
(b) State employees, even if the employee works for an officer, insti-
tution or entity that is excluded from the definition of "agency" under
section 67-9203, Idaho Code; and
(c) Vendors or any person acting on behalf of a vendor.
(2) In any matter relating to state procurement, it is an unethical
breach of the public trust to:
(a) Knowingly attempt to realize personal gain through state office or
employment by any conduct inconsistent with this chapter or any other
applicable law or rule;
(b) Attempt to influence a state officer or employee to violate the pol-
icy or provisions of this chapter or any other applicable law or rule; or


(c) Knowingly violate an applicable law or rule.
(3) Subject to due process requirements, and in addition to any other
administrative, civil or criminal sanctions provided by law or rule, a state
employee's supervisor may impose the following sanctions on the employee for
an unethical breach of the public trust:
(a) A reprimand or warning, either oral or written;
(b) Suspension with or without pay for a specified period of time; or
(c) Termination of employment.
(4) In addition to any other administrative, civil or criminal sanction
provided by law or rule, a vendor who commits an unethical breach of the pub-
lic trust, or whose advocate or representative commits an unethical breach
of the public trust, may be disqualified pursuant to section 67-9217, Idaho
Code.
(5) Vendors, employees of vendors, or any person acting on behalf of
vendors shall report to the secretary of state any financial expenditures
over fifty dollars ($50.00), including but not limited to reimbursements for
meals and travel.
SECTION 15. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after July
1, 2026.